Utah statutes.
17-50-404.   Judgments against county -- Payment.
(1)  If a judgment is obtained against a county, it shall be paid as are other
county charges.
(2)  The county  legislative body shall levy and authorize the collection of a
sufficient amount of revenue to pay off and discharge such judgment in
addition to the ordinary expenses of the county, but the property of the
county and of the persons owning property situated or liable to taxation in
the county may not be liable to judgment lien or to seizure or sale upon
execution or other process of any court.
